src/fst/morphology/affixes/Der_vv_IV.lexc
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:nngillatuar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngillatuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nngillatuaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv:nngilluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngilluaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv+USAR+Der/vv:nngilluaasar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUAR+Der/vv+USAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngilluaasaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:nngilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:nngilluinnarniar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngilluinnarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:nngilluinnarnerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:nngilluinnaqqu HTR_V_SAQ_si ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:nngilluinnarsima IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nngilluinnarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngilluinnarsinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nngilluinnassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngilluinnassagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:nngilluinnartig IV-mod_schwa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nngilluinnartigissa IV-mod_ssa ; ! suunngilluinnartigissasoq piss. 20241228 OD
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:nngingaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngingaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:nngingaatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngingaatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:nngingaatsiariar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngingaatsiariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv:nngingajap IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngingajakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:nngingajassima IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:nngingajattuar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngingajattuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:nngingajattuaannar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngingajattuaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:nngingajavip IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:nnginniar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GAJUP+Der/vv:nnginniarajup IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnginniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:nnginniaraluariar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:nnginniaraluariarsinnar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:nnginniari XIgujoqX ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv:nnginniarumaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnginniarumaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:nnginniarneru IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nnginniarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nnginniarsinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nnginniassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:nnginnerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:nnginneru IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:nnginnerungaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnginnerungaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nnginnerussa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:nnginnguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnginnguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:nnginnguatsiavip IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv:nngippasip IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nnge%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+NNGIT+Der/vv+QQAJAA+Der/vv:nngeqqajaa IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+QQAJAR+Der/vv:nngeqqajar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+QQAJAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngeqqajaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+QQAJAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nngeqqaja%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngeqqinnavianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:nngeriar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngeriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIATAAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nngeriasaarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIATAAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nngeriataarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:nngereer IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngereeraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:nngereersima IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngereersimagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv:nngeruttor IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngeruttoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:nngissima IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngissimanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv:nngissimaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisimaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngissimaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisimaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv:nngissimaallar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisimaallar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngissimaallaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisimaallaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nngissimaallaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisimaallaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv:nngissimaarpallaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisimaarpallaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngissimaarpallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisimaarpallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nngissinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nngissa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv:nngissaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SURE+Der/vv:nngitsor HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+SURE+Der/vv:nngissor HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:nngitsig IV-mod_schwa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsigigaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nngitsigissa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsigissagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:nngitsip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv+Orth/Arch+Use/-Spell:nngisip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv+GIP+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:nngitsigitip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:nngitsiar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:nngitsiariar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsiariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:nngittuar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngittuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nngittuaralua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv:nngitsoor IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsooraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv:nngitsoorumaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+GUNNAR+Der/nn+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngitsoorunnanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+GUNNAR+Der/nn+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsoorunnanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:nngitsoornar IV-mod_nar ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv:nngitsoornaviar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngitsoornavianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsoornavianngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+NAVIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nngitsoornavianngikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:nngitsoorsima IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:nngitsoorsimariar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsoorsimariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:nngitsoorsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngitsoorsinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv:nngitsuussaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngitsuussaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:nngitsoortip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUSAAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+VISSUR+Der/vv:nngitsuusaarniavissor IV-mod_r ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+USAR+Der/vv:nngiusar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+USAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngiusaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+USAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:nngiusaannar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+USAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngiusaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv:nngippallaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngippallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngippallaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nngippallaa%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nngippallaassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngippallaassanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+SURE+Der/vv:nngippallaarsor HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:nngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+Orth/Alt+VIP+Der/vv:nngiivip IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngivikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUALLAARE+Der/vv:nnguallaar flex-iv_schwa ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv:nnguar IV-mod_nnguar ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnguaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:nnguaraluari XIgujoqX ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:nnguaraluarnar IV-mod_nar ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:nnguaraluarnari XIgujoqX3 ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nnguaraluanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:nnguari XIgujoqX ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+KULUP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nnguakkulo%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:nngualaar IV-mod_laar ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:nngualaaginnar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngualaaginnaraluar IV-mod_C ; 
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nnguanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nngua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nanngua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; !17122019 PN. qujanannguaqaatit
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:nnguassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nnguassanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnguarsinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GI+Der/vv:nnguarsinnari XIgujoqX ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+TAAR+Der/vv:nnguasaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUAR+Der/vv+TAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnguasaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:nnguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:nnguatsiangaar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:nnguatsia%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:nnguatsiartig IV-mod_schwa ;
+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nnguatsiartigigaluar IV-mod_C ; 
+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:nnguatsiavip IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGUJUUR+Der/vv:nngujoor IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUJUUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:nngujooraluar IV-mod_C ;
+NNGUJUUR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv:nngujoorpasip  IV-mod_iC ;
+NNGUJUUR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:nngujoorpasinngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+NNGUJUUR+Der/vv+UTIGE+Der/vv:nngujuujutig flex-iv_schwa ;
+PAJAAR+Der/vv:pajaar IV-mod_C ;
+PAJAAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:pajaarallar gallar-iv ;
